Montana, session 2025, HB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 20-9-116, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-116. (Temporary) Resolution of intent to increase nonvoted levy -- notice. (1) The trustees
of a school district shall adopt a resolution no later than March 31 of each fiscal year and provide notice
pursuant to subsection (2) whenever the trustees intend to impose an increase in a nonvoted levy in the
ensuing school fiscal year for the purposes of funding any of the funds listed below:
(a) the tuition fund under 20-5-324;
(b) the adult education fund under 20-7-705;
(c) the transportation fund under 20-10-143 and 20-10-144;
(d) the bus depreciation reserve fund under 20-10-147; and
(e) the flexibility fund established in 20-9-543 for the purposes in 20-7-1602.
(2) The trustees shall provide notice of intent to impose an increase in a nonvoted levy for the
ensuing school fiscal year by:
(a) adopting a resolution of intent to impose an increase in a nonvoted levy that includes, at a
minimum, the estimated number of increased or decreased mills to be imposed and the estimated increased or
decreased revenue to be raised compared to nonvoted levies under subsections (1)(a) through (1)(e) imposed
in the current school fiscal year and, based on the district's taxable valuation most recently certified by the
department of revenue under 15-10-202, the estimated impacts of the increase or decrease on a home valued
at $100,000 and a home valued at $200,000 homes valued at $100,000, $300,000, and $600,000; and
(b) publishing in a newspaper that will give notice to the largest number of people of the district as
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 22
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 22
determined by the trustees and posting to the school district's website:
(i) the resolution under subsection (2)(a); and
(ii) the resolution under 20-9-502(3)(a)(i) if adopted by the trustees. (Terminates June 30, 2027--
sec. 7, Ch. 402, L. 2019.)
20-9-116. (Effective July 1, 2027) Resolution of intent to increase nonvoted levy -- notice. (1)
The trustees of a school district shall adopt a resolution no later than June 1 in fiscal year 2017 only and no
later than March 31 in fiscal year 2018 and subsequent fiscal years and provide notice pursuant to subsection
(2) whenever the trustees intend to impose an increase in a nonvoted levy in the ensuing school fiscal year for
the purposes of funding any of the funds listed below:
(a) the tuition fund under 20-5-324;
(b) the adult education fund under 20-7-705;
(c) the transportation fund under 20-10-143 and 20-10-144; and
(d) the bus depreciation reserve fund under 20-10-147.
(2) The trustees shall provide notice of intent to impose an increase in a nonvoted levy for the
ensuing school fiscal year by:
(a) adopting a resolution of intent to impose an increase in a nonvoted levy that includes, at a
minimum, the estimated number of increased or decreased mills to be imposed and the estimated increased or
decreased revenue to be raised compared to nonvoted levies under subsections (1)(a) through (1)(d) imposed
in the current school fiscal year and, based on the district's taxable valuation most recently certified by the
department of revenue under 15-10-202, the estimated impacts of the increase or decrease on a home valued
at $100,000 and a home valued at $200,000 homes valued at $100,000, $300,000, and $600,000; and
(b) publishing in a newspaper that will give notice to the largest number of people of the district as
determined by the trustees and posting to the school district's website:
(i) the resolution under subsection (2)(a); and
(ii) the resolution under 20-9-502(3)(a)(i) if adopted by the trustees."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 22
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 22, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 22
INTRODUCED BY M. ROMANO
BY REQUEST OF THE EDUCATION INTERIM COMMITTEE
AN ACT ALIGNING THE HOME VALUE AMOUNTS FOR SCHOOL DISTRICT PROPERTY TAX IMPACT
STATEMENTS WITH OTHERS IN STATUTE; AND AMENDING SECTION 20-9-116, MCA.”